District of Columbia statutes.
38-2001.10

Death of teacher — Designation of beneficiary.

Every teacher from whose salary retirement deductions are made in accordance with this subchapter shall be required to designate in writing a beneficiary or beneficiaries to whom the amount of his deductions, together with interest then credited thereon, shall be payable in the event of the death of such teacher.

History

Jan. 15, 1920, 41 Stat. 389, ch. 39, § 10
June 11, 1926, 44 Stat. 729, ch. 556, § 1
Apr. 5, 1939, 53 Stat. 571, ch. 42, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1210.
1973 Ed., § 31-710.